testing/sms-test-V-viikkad.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: sms/bin/sms-gen.hfstol
    Morph: sms/bin/sms.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: sms/bin/isms.fst
    Morph: sms/bin/sms.fst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - viikkâd: # Verb 'to run' - full paradigm
     viikkâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viiǥǥam
     viikkâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: viiǥǥak
     viikkâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: veekk
     viikkâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: viikkâp
     viikkâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: viikkve´ted
     viikkâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: ve´ǩǩe 
     viikkâd+V+Ind+Prs+4: viiǥǥat
     viikkâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vi´ǩǩem 
     viikkâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: vi´ǩǩiǩ 
     viikkâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: viiǥǥi
     viikkâd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [viiǥǥim, viiǥǥin]
     viikkâd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: viiǥǥid
     viikkâd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: vi´ǩǩe
     viikkâd+V+Ind+Prt+4: vi´ǩǩeš
     viikkâd+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: viiǥǥžem
     viikkâd+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: viiǥǥžiǩ
     viikkâd+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: viiǥǥaž
     viikkâd+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: [viiǥǥžep, viiǥǥžim, viiǥǥžin]
     viikkâd+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: viiǥǥžid 
     viikkâd+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: viiǥǥže
     viikkâd+V+Pot+Prs+4: vue´ljžet
     viikkâd+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: viiǥǥčem
     viikkâd+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: viiǥǥčiǩ
     viikkâd+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: viiǥǥči
     viikkâd+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: [viiǥǥčim, viiǥǥčin, viiǥǥčep]
     viikkâd+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: viiǥǥčid
     viikkâd+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: viiǥǥče
     viikkâd+V+Cond+Prs+4: viiǥǥčeš
     viikkâd+V+Imprt+Prs+Sg2: viiǥǥ
     viikkâd+V+Imprt+Prs+Sg3: veeǥǥas
     viikkâd+V+Imprt+Prs+Pl1: viikkâp
     viikkâd+V+Imprt+Prs+Pl2: viikkâd
     viikkâd+V+Imprt+Prs+Pl3: vekkaz
     viikkâd+V+AktEss:    viikkmen
     viikkâd+V+Akt:    viikkâm
     viikkâd+V+PrsPcp:    viikki
     viikkâd+V+PrfPrc: viikkâm
     viikkâd+V+Pss+PrfPrc: vikkum
     viikkâd+V+VAbess: [viiǥǥkani, viiǥǥǩeännai]
     viikkâd+V+Ger: viiǥǥeen
     viikkâd+V+Ger: viiǥǥee´l
     viikkâd+V+Neg.Conv: vikku
     
